Utah statutes.
41-1a-410.   Eligibility for personalized plates.

(1)  A person who is the registered owner of a vehicle not subject to registration under Section 41-1a-301, registered with the division, or who applies for an original registration of a vehicle not subject to registration under Section 41-1a-301, may upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 41-1a-1211 apply to the division for personalized license plates.

(2)  Application shall be made in accordance with Section 41-1a-411.

(3)  The personalized plates shall be affixed to the vehicle for which registration is sought in lieu of the regular license plates.

(4)  Personalized license plates shall be issued only to the registered owner of the vehicle on which they are to be displayed.



Amended by Chapter 222, 1993 General Session

